Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.72.290

Printing ballot titles on ballots—Separate headings.

The county auditor of each county shall print the serial numbers, ballot titles, and public investment impact disclosures certified by the secretary of state on the official ballots for the election at which initiative and referendum measures are to be submitted to the people for their approval or rejection. They must appear under separate headings in the order of the serial numbers as follows:

(1) Initiatives to the people;

(2) Referendum measures;

(3) Referendum bills;

(4) Initiatives to the legislature;

(5) Initiatives to the legislature and legislative alternatives;

(6) Proposed constitutional amendments.

[ 2023 c 109 s 6; 2022 c 114 s 4; 2013 c 11 s 76; 2008 c 1 s 11 (Initiative Measure No. 960, approved November 6, 2007); 2003 c 111 s 1829; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.300. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 23; RRS s 5419. Formerly RCW 29.79.300.]

NOTES:

Findings—2023 c 109: See note following RCW 29A.32.070.

Findings—2022 c 114: See note following RCW 29A.72.027.

Findings—Intent—Construction—Severability—Subheadings and part headings not law—Short title—Effective date—2008 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 960): See notes following RCW 43.135.031.